Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 4.Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201081-1207
Job training
grant; repayment required; when;
training grant; repayment required; when.

(1) If a business which receives
a job training grant creates fewer jobs than stated in the business plan,
the business shall repay the job training grant as provided in this subsection. If less than fifty percent of the
proposed jobs are created, one hundred percent of the grant shall be repaid.
If fifty percent or more but less than seventy percent of the proposed jobs
are created, fifty percent of the grant shall be repaid. If seventy percent
or more but less than ninety percent of the proposed jobs are created, twenty-five
percent of the grant shall be repaid. If ninety percent or more of the proposed
jobs are created, no repayment is required.

(2) If a business
receives a training grant and fewer trainees than stated in the business plan
complete the training, the business shall repay the grant as provided in this
subsection. For every trainee who does not complete the training, the business
shall repay fifty percent of the prorated share of such trainee's uncompleted
training costs.

Laws 1995, LB 326, § 6;

Laws 2010, LB961, § 4.
July 15, 2010